Utah statutes.
20A-13-201.   Senators -- When elected.

At the general election in November, 1932, and at each general election immediately preceding the expiration of the term of office of a United States senator from Utah, there shall be elected one United States senator to serve for a period of six years.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1995 General Session

